Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.114

Recommended comprehensive plan for performance of additional function—Resolution for special election to authorize additional function—Contents—Hearings—Election procedure.

Whenever a recommended comprehensive plan for the performance of any additional metropolitan function shall have been prepared and the metropolitan council shall have found the plan to be feasible the council may by resolution call a special election to authorize the performance of such additional function without the filing of the petitions or resolutions provided for in RCW 35.58.100.

If the metropolitan council shall determine that the performance of such function requires enlargement of the metropolitan area, such resolution shall contain a description of the boundaries of the proposed metropolitan area and may be adopted only after a public hearing thereon before the council. Notice of such hearing shall be published once a week for at least two consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the proposed metropolitan area. The notice shall contain a description of the boundaries of the proposed metropolitan area, shall name the additional function or functions to be performed and shall state the time and place of the hearing and the fact that any changes in the boundaries of the proposed metropolitan area will be considered at such time and place. At such hearing any interested person may appear and be heard. The council may make such changes in the proposed metropolitan area as they shall deem reasonable and proper, but may not delete any portion of the existing metropolitan area and may not delete any portion of the proposed additional area which will create an island of included or excluded lands. If the council shall determine that the proposed additional area should be further enlarged, a second hearing shall be held and notice given in the same manner as for the original hearing. The council may adjourn the hearing or hearings from time to time.

Following the conclusion of such hearing or hearings the council may adopt a resolution fixing the boundaries of the proposed metropolitan area and calling a special election on the performance of such additional function. If the metropolitan municipal corporation is then authorized to perform the function of metropolitan sewage disposal the council may provide in such resolution that local governmental agencies collecting sewage from areas outside the metropolitan area as same is constituted on the date of adoption of such resolution will not thereafter be required to discharge such sewage into the metropolitan sewer system or to secure approval of local construction plans from the metropolitan municipal corporation unless such local agency shall first have entered into a contract with the metropolitan municipal corporation for the disposal of such sewage. The metropolitan council may also provide in such resolution that the authorization to perform such additional function be effective only if the voters at such election also authorize the issuance of any general obligation bonds required to carry out the recommended comprehensive plan.

The resolution calling such election shall fix the form of the ballot proposition and the same may vary from that specified in RCW 35.58.100. If the metropolitan council shall find that the issuance of general obligation bonds is necessary to perform such additional function and to carry out such recommended comprehensive plan then the ballot proposition shall set forth the principal amount of such bonds and the maximum maturity thereof and the proposition shall be so worded that the voters may by a single yes or no vote authorize the performance of the designated function in the area described in the resolution and the issuance of such general obligation bonds.

The persons voting at such election shall be all of the qualified voters who have resided within the boundaries of the proposed metropolitan area for at least thirty days preceding the date of the election. The election shall be conducted and canvassed as provided in RCW 35.58.090.

If the resolution calling such election does not require the approval of general obligation bonds as a condition of the performance of such additional function and if a majority of the persons voting on the ballot proposition residing within the existing metropolitan municipal corporation shall vote in favor thereof and a majority of the persons residing within the area proposed to be added to the existing metropolitan municipal corporation shall vote in favor thereof the boundaries described in the resolution calling the election shall become the boundaries of the metropolitan municipal corporation and the metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the additional function described in the proposition.

If the resolution calling such election shall require the authorization of general obligation bonds as a condition of the performance of such additional function, then to be effective the ballot proposition must be approved as provided in the preceding paragraph and must also be approved by at least three-fifths of the persons voting thereon and the number of persons voting on such proposition must constitute not less than forty percent of the total number of votes cast within such area at the last preceding state general election.

[ 1967 c 105 s 8.]